Illinois, session 104th, HB1434.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Health 5Care Facility Fee Transparency Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Campus" means: 8        (1) the physical area immediately adjacent to a 9    hospital's main buildings and other areas and structures 10    that are not strictly contiguous to the main buildings but 11    are located within 250 yards of the main building; or 12        (2) any other building that is part of a hospital's 13    campus.14    "Facility Fee" means any fee charged or billed by a 15hospital or health system for outpatient hospital services 16provided in a hospital-based facility that is: 17        (1) intended to compensate the hospital or health 18    system for its operational expenses; and 19        (2) separate and distinct from a professional fee 20    charged or billed by a health care provider for 21    professional medical services. 22    "Health care system" or "Health system" means: 23        (1) a parent corporation of one or more hospitals and   HB1434- 2 -LRB104 05783 BDA 15813 b1    any entity affiliated with such corporation through 2    ownership, governance, membership, or other means; or 3        (2) a hospital and any entity affiliated with such 4    hospital through ownership, governance, membership, or 5    other means. 6    "Hospital" means any facility or institution required to 7be licensed pursuant to the Hospital Licensing Act or operated 8under the University of Illinois Hospital Act. 9    "Hospital-based facility" means a facility that is owned 10or operated, in whole or in part, by a hospital or health 11system where hospital or professional medical services are 12provided. 13    "Professional fee" means any fee charged or billed by a 14provider for professional medical services provided in a 15hospital-based facility. 16    "Provider" means an individual, entity, corporation, or 17health care provider, whether for profit or nonprofit, whose 18primary purpose is to provide professional medical services. 19    Section 10. Requirement of hospitals or health care 20systems to provide transparency regarding facility fees.21    (a) If a hospital or health system charges a facility fee 22utilizing a current procedural terminology evaluation and 23management (CPT E/M) code for outpatient services provided at 24a hospital-based facility where a professional fee is also 25expected to be charged, the hospital or health system shall   HB1434- 3 -LRB104 05783 BDA 15813 b1provide the patient with a written notice containing the 2following information: 3        (1) that the hospital-based facility fee is part of a 4    hospital or health system which charges a facility fee in 5    addition to and separate from the professional fee charged 6    or billed by the provider; 7        (2) the amount of the patient's potential financial 8    liability, including any facility fees likely to be 9    charged and any professional fees likely to be charged; if 10    the exact type and extent of the professional medical 11    services needed are not known or the terms of a patient's 12    health insurance coverage are not known with reasonable 13    certainty, an estimate of the patient's potential 14    financial liability shall be provided based on typical 15    charges for the services provided to the patient at the 16    hospital-based facility, including the cost of the 17    facility fee; 18        (3) a statement that the patient's financial liability 19    will depend on professional medical services provided; 20        (4) an explanation that the patient may incur a 21    financial liability that is greater than if the 22    professional medical services were provided by a facility 23    that is not hospital-based; and 24        (5) that a patient covered by a health insurance 25    policy should contact the patient's health insurance 26    provider for additional information regarding the   HB1434- 4 -LRB104 05783 BDA 15813 b1    hospital's or health system's charges or fees, as well as 2    the patient's potential financial liability for those 3    charges and fees. 4    (b) If a hospital or health system charges a facility fee 5without using a current procedural terminology and management 6(CPT E/M) code for outpatient services provided at a 7hospital-based facility, located outside the boundaries of the 8hospital campus, the hospital or health system shall provide 9the patient with a written notice containing the following 10information: 11        (1) that the hospital-based facility is part of a 12    hospital or health system which charges a facility fee in 13    addition to and separate from the professional fee charged 14    or billed by the provider; 15        (2) a statement that the patient's actual financial 16    liability will depend on the professional medical services 17    actually provided to the patient; 18        (3) an explanation that the patient may incur a 19    financial liability that is greater than if the 20    professional medical services were provided by a facility 21    that is not hospital-based; and 22        (4) that a patient covered by a health insurance 23    policy should contact the patient's health insurance 24    provider for additional information regarding the 25    hospital's or health system's charges of fees, as well as 26    the patient's potential financial liability for those   HB1434- 5 -LRB104 05783 BDA 15813 b1    charges and fees. 2    (c) The written notice described in this Section shall be 3in simple language in a form that a patient who does not 4possess any knowledge regarding hospital or health system 5charges and fees would be able to understand. 6    (d) The notice described in this Section shall be provided 7to the patient in the following manner: 8        (1) For non-emergency care, if a patient's appointment 9    is scheduled to occur 10 or more days after the 10    appointment is made, written notice shall be sent to the 11    patient by first class mail, encrypted electronic mail, or 12    a secure patient Internet portal not less than 3 days 13    after the appointment is made. If an appointment is 14    scheduled to occur less than 10 days after the appointment 15    is made, written notice shall be hand-delivered to the 16    patient when the patient arrives at the hospital-based 17    facility. 18        (2) For emergency care, written notice shall be 19    provided to the patient as soon as practicable after the 20    patient is stabilized or is determined to not have an 21    emergency medical condition and before the patient leaves 22    the hospital-based facility. If the patient is 23    unconscious, under great duress, or for any other reason 24    is unable to read the notice and act on the patient's 25    rights, the notice shall be provided to the patient's 26    representative as soon as practicable.   HB1434- 6 -LRB104 05783 BDA 15813 b1    (e) A hospital-based facility shall prominently display 2written notices in locations that are readily accessible to 3and visible by patients, including patient waiting areas, 4stating that: 5        (1) the hospital-based facility is part of a hospital 6    or health system; and 7        (2) if the hospital-based facility charges a facility 8    fee, the patient may incur a financial liability greater 9    than if the facility was not hospital-based. 10    (f) A hospital-based facility shall clearly hold itself 11out to the public and payers as being hospital based, 12including, at a minimum, by stating the name of the hospital or 13health system in its signage, marketing materials, Internet 14websites, and stationary. 15    (g) A failure by a health system, health facility, or 16hospital to comply with the requirements in this Act 17constitutes an unlawful practice under the Consumer Fraud and 18Deceptive Business Practices Act. 19    Section 15. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 20Practices Act is amended by changing Section 2Z as follows: 21    (815 ILCS 505/2Z)  (from Ch. 121 1/2, par. 262Z)22    Sec. 2Z. Violations of other Acts. Any person who 23knowingly violates the Automotive Repair Act, the Automotive 24Collision Repair Act, the Home Repair and Remodeling Act, the   HB1434- 7 -LRB104 05783 BDA 15813 b1Dance Studio Act, the Physical Fitness Services Act, the 2Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act, the Illinois Union 3Label Act, the Installment Sales Contract Act, the Job 4Referral and Job Listing Services Consumer Protection Act, the 5Travel Promotion Consumer Protection Act, the Credit Services 6Organizations Act, the Automatic Telephone Dialers Act, the 7Pay-Per-Call Services Consumer Protection Act, the Telephone 8Solicitations Act, the Illinois Funeral or Burial Funds Act, 9the Cemetery Oversight Act, the Cemetery Care Act, the Safe 10and Hygienic Bed Act, the Illinois Pre-Need Cemetery Sales 11Act, the High Risk Home Loan Act, the Payday Loan Reform Act, 12the Predatory Loan Prevention Act, the Mortgage Rescue Fraud 13Act, subsection (a) or (b) of Section 3-10 of the Cigarette Tax 14Act, subsection (a) or (b) of Section 3-10 of the Cigarette Use 15Tax Act, the Electronic Mail Act, the Internet Caller 16Identification Act, paragraph (6) of subsection (k) of Section 176-305 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, Section 11-1431, 18d-115, 1818d-120, 18d-125, 18d-135, 18d-150, or 18d-153 of the Illinois 19Vehicle Code, Article 3 of the Residential Real Property 20Disclosure Act, the Automatic Contract Renewal Act, the 21Reverse Mortgage Act, Section 25 of the Youth Mental Health 22Protection Act, the Personal Information Protection Act, or 23the Student Online Personal Protection Act, or the Health Care 24Facility Fee Transparency Act commits an unlawful practice 25within the meaning of this Act.26(Source: P.A. 100-315, eff. 8-24-17; 100-416, eff. 1-1-18;   HB1434- 8 -LRB104 05783 BDA 15813 b1100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-658, eff. 3-23-21.)